Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2269
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-2243 to 29-2269 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Probation Administration Act.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 31;

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 14;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB800, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB464, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 25;

Laws 2023, LB50, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 25.